Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1314.01
Six-month
case reviews; office; duties.

(1) The office shall
be the only entity responsible
for the conduct of periodic foster
care file audit case reviews which shall be identified as reviews
which meet the federal requirements for six-month case reviews pursuant to
the federal Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Public Law
96-272. The office shall be fiscally responsible
for any noncompliance sanctions imposed by the federal government related
to the requirements for review outlined in the federal Adoption Assistance
and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Public Law 96-272.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that any six-month
court review of a juvenile pursuant to sections 43-278 and 43-1313 shall be
identified as a review which meets the federal requirements for six-month
case reviews pursuant to the federal Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare
Act of 1980, Public Law 96-272.

(3) The office may
assist the Department of Health and Human Services as to eligibility under
Title IV-E for state wards and eligibility for Supplemental Security Income,
Supplemental Security Disability Income, Veterans Administration, or aid to
families with dependent children benefits, for child support orders of the
court, and for medical insurance other than medicaid.

Laws 1996, LB 642, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 76;

Laws 1999, LB 240, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 14.